Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE A. HUNTING AND FISHING LICENSES

CHAPTER 43. SPECIAL LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBCHAPTER C. PERMITS FOR SCIENTIFIC RESEARCH, ZOOLOGICAL COLLECTION, REHABILITATION, AND EDUCATIONAL DISPLAY

Sec. 43.021. PROTECTED WILDLIFE. In this subchapter, "protected wildlife" means all indigenous mammals, indigenous birds, indigenous reptiles, indigenous amphibians, indigenous fish, and other indigenous aquatic life the taking, collecting, holding, possession, propagation, release, display, or transport of which is governed by a provision of this code other than this subchapter or by a commission rule adopted under any provision of this code other than this subchapter and includes endangered species.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 2, eff. Dec. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.022. PERMIT REQUIREMENT. (a) No person may collect, hold, possess, display, transport, release, or propagate protected wildlife for the purposes of this subchapter without a permit issued under this subchapter.

(b) A permit under this subchapter is not required for an activity that may be lawfully conducted under the authority of another license or permit issued under this code or in accordance with another provision of this code.

(c) No other license is required for an activity conducted under the authority of a permit issued under this subchapter.

(d) A permit under this subchapter is not required to hold, transport, propagate, or display a marine mammal held under the authority of the federal Marine Mammal Protection Act (16 U.S.C. Section 1361 et seq.) unless the marine mammal is:

(1) a marine mammal for which the department has been delegated management authority under Section 1379 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act (16 U.S.C. Section 1379); or

(2) a marine mammal listed under the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Section 1531 et seq.).

(e) The department may issue a permit to a qualified person to collect, hold, possess, display, transport, release, or propagate protected wildlife for scientific research, educational display, zoological collection, or rehabilitation. A permit may not be issued to propagate protected wildlife for rehabilitation or educational display.

(f) The commission shall adopt rules to govern the collecting, holding, possession, propagation, release, display, or transport of protected wildlife for scientific research, educational display, zoological collection, or rehabilitation.

(g) The commission by rule may set fees for review of permit applications, inspections, transportation and boarding of seized animals, laboratory analysis, or other department actions necessary for implementation of this subchapter.

(h) The commission by rule may exempt certain categories of activities from the permitting and fee requirements of or established under this subchapter if those activities are determined to provide a public benefit and do not adversely affect a protected wildlife resource.

(i) A permit authorized by this subchapter may be issued by the director or the director's designee.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 3, eff. Dec. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.024. DISPOSITION OF PROTECTED WILDLIFE. (a) All protected wildlife collected and subsequently held under this subchapter or rules adopted under this subchapter remain the property of the state and shall be relinquished to the department or an agent of the department on demand or otherwise disposed of in a manner prescribed by the department.

(b) No permit may be issued for the taking or transportation of any endangered fish or wildlife the possession, taking, or transportation of which is prohibited by federal law.

(c) A permit issued for the taking of migratory birds is not valid unless the applicant has obtained a federal permit for the taking of migratory birds.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 4, eff. Dec. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.028. CIVIL SUIT; INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; COSTS. (a) The department, on the approval of the director or commission, may authorize the filing and prosecution of a civil suit to enforce this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter.

(b) On finding of a violation of this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter, a court may assess a civil penalty in addition to providing injunctive relief. The penalty may not exceed $1,000 for each violation. Each day of violation is a separate offense. A civil suit filed under this subchapter is not a bar to any criminal or administrative action.

(c) On entry of a judgment in favor of the department, the court may award attorney's fees and court costs to the state.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 5, eff. Dec. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.030. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 43.022, a commission rule, or the conditions of a permit issued under this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 6, eff. Dec. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER D. HUNTING LEASE LICENSES

Sec. 43.041. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Hunting cooperative" means a cooperative enterprise in which participating landowners pool their acreage and lease it for hunting purposes under the authority of a hunting lease license and in which the leasing profits are distributed to the landowners according to the landowners' participation.

(2) "Hunting lease" means the aggregate amount of land owned by one individual, partnership, firm, or corporation or the aggregate amount of land in a hunting cooperative in a county and leased for hunting purposes. If an individual, partnership, firm, or corporation owns a single tract of land, or if a hunting cooperative has land, located partially in one county and partially in another county, the individual, partnership, firm, or corporation or the hunting cooperative may not be required to have a separate hunting lease license for that portion of the land located in the second county, unless the individual, partnership, firm, or corporation, or a landowner participating in the hunting cooperative, owns other land leased for hunting purposes in the second county. If an individual, partnership, firm, or corporation owns a single tract of land, or if a hunting cooperative has land, located partially in one county and partially in another county and the individual, partnership, firm, or corporation or the hunting cooperative is not required to have two licenses, the aggregate acreage of the tract shall be used for determining the amount of the license fee required by this subchapter.

(3) "Licensee" means:

(A) a person who owns the land, or manages a hunting cooperative that has land, on which a hunting lease is located; or

(B) an individual listed on the license application as the landowner's agent who holds a hunting lease license.

(4) "Guest" means a person, other than a licensee, who hunts or takes an animal or bird on a hunting lease.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1204, ch. 456, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 15.02, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 805, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.042. LICENSE REQUIRED. (a) The owner of a hunting lease or the landowner's agent may not receive as a guest for pay or other consideration another person engaged in hunting unless the owner or agent has acquired a hunting lease license from the department.

(b) The license shall be displayed on the hunting lease.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1204, ch. 456, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.043. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE. The department may issue a hunting lease license only in the name of the owner of a hunting lease or the name of the landowner's agent.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1204, ch. 456, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.0431. APPLICATION FOR LICENSE. (a) The department may require an application for a license and may prescribe the form and content of the application.

(b) A written agreement containing the name, signature, address, and number of acres for each participating landowner included in a hunting cooperative must be attached to the application for a hunting lease license for a hunting lease that is a hunting cooperative.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 805, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.0432. WILDLIFE MANAGEMENT ASSOCIATION AREA HUNTING LEASE LICENSES. (a) The owner of a tract of land included in a wildlife management association area under Section 81.301 of this code may apply for a wildlife management association area hunting lease license for that tract of land.

(b) A wildlife management association area hunting lease license applies only to the tract of land for which it is issued.

(c) Except as inconsistent with this section, this subchapter applies to a wildlife management association area hunting lease license in the same manner that it applies to a hunting lease license.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 418, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 635, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 43.044. LICENSE FEES. (a) The fees for hunting lease licenses, other than hunting leases that are hunting cooperatives, are determined by the following schedule or determined by the commission, whichever amount is more:

(1) $15 if the area of the hunting lease is less than 500 acres;

(2) $40 if the area of the hunting lease is 500 acres or more but less than 1,000 acres; and

(3) $60 if the area of the hunting lease is 1,000 acres or more.

(b) The fee for a license for a hunting lease that is a hunting cooperative is as follows:

(1) $60 + $5 per participating landowner if the area of the hunting lease is less than 10,000 acres;

(2) $120 + $5 per participating landowner if the area of the hunting lease is between 10,000 and 50,000 acres; and

(3) $240 + $5 per participating landowner if the area of the hunting lease is over 50,000 acres.

(c) The fee for a wildlife management association area hunting lease license is:

(1) $30 + $5 per participating landowner if the area of the wildlife management association is less than 10,000 acres;

(2) $60 + $5 per participating landowner if the area of the wildlife management association is between 10,000 and 50,000 acres; and

(3) $120 + $5 per participating landowner if the area of the wildlife management association is over 50,000 acres.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1204, ch. 456, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1329, ch. 277, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 15.03, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 805, Sec. 3 eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 418, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 635, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 43.045. DURATION OF LICENSE. A hunting lease license is valid for the period from September 1 or another date set by the commission through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a license fee for a license issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this subchapter and provide for a license term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1204, ch. 456, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 20, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 43.055. PENALTY. A person who violates any provision of this subchapter or who fails to comply with any provision of this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Renumbered from Sec. 43.057 and amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1204, ch. 456, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 813, ch. 303, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1977; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER E. PERMITS FOR TRAPPING, TRANSPORTING, AND TRANSPLANTING GAME ANIMALS AND GAME BIRDS

Sec. 43.061. TRAPPING, TRANSPORTING, AND TRANSPLANTING GAME ANIMALS AND GAME BIRDS; PERMIT REQUIRED. (a) No person may capture, transport, or transplant any game animal or game bird from the wild in this state unless that person has obtained a permit to trap, transport, and transplant from the department.

(b) The department may issue permits for trapping, transporting, and transplanting game animals or game birds from the wild to allow adjustments in game populations for better wildlife management. The permits may be issued only if recommended by separate wildlife stocking plans approved by the department for both the origin and the destination of the game animals or game birds.

(c) The state is not liable for and may not incur any expense for the trapping, transporting, and transplanting of game animals and game birds under a permit issued under this section.

(d) A person receiving a permit under this section commits an offense if that person does not comply with the conditions listed on the permit, including conditions designed to minimize stress and maximize the humane treatment of trapped or transplanted animals and to minimize human health and safety risks.

(e) This section does not apply to any game animals or game birds that are possessed or propagated under a license or permit issued for that activity under another section of this code or to an activity conducted under a permit issued under Section 43.0611.

(f) The commission by rule may set fees for review of permit applications or other department actions necessary to implement this section. If the permit authorizes the applicant to trap, transport, and transplant squirrels that are causing damage to personal property, the applicant is exempt from the payment of the fee.

(g) The commission shall adopt rules for the content of wildlife stocking plans, certification of wildlife trappers, and the trapping, transporting, and transplanting of game animals and game birds under this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 8, eff. Dec. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.0611. URBAN WHITE-TAILED DEER REMOVAL; PERMIT REQUIRED. (a) The department may issue to an individual an urban white-tailed deer removal permit for the trapping, transporting, and transplanting of white-tailed deer if the individual shows to the department's satisfaction that:

(1) there is an overpopulation of the deer in an area where deer hunting is inadequate, because of human health or safety concerns, for maintaining a balanced population of deer;

(2) the deer will be removed and transplanted to an area of adaptable natural habitat capable of sustaining the additional deer without exceeding the capacity of the habitat; and

(3) the deer will be subject to lawful hunting after the relocation.

(b) The state is not liable for and may not incur any expense for the trapping, transporting, and transplanting of white-tailed deer under a permit issued under this section.

(c) The commission by rule may set fees for review of permit applications or other department actions necessary to implement this section. If the permit authorizes the applicant to remove white-tailed deer only from property owned by a political subdivision or institution of higher education of this state, the applicant is exempt from the payment of the fee.

(d) A person holding a permit issued under this section commits an offense if that person does not comply with conditions listed on the permit, including conditions designed to minimize stress and maximize the humane treatment of trapped or transplanted animals and that minimize human health and safety risks.

(e) The department may establish times when only department staff may trap, transport, or transplant deer under this section.

(f) Permits issued under this section do not entitle a person to take, trap, or possess white-tailed deer on any privately owned land without the landowner's written permission.

(g) The commission shall adopt rules for fees, applications, and activities, including limitations on the times of the activities, relating to permits for trapping, transporting, or transplanting white-tailed deer.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 927, Sec. 9, eff. Dec. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.0612. TRAPPING AND TRANSPORTING SURPLUS WHITE-TAILED DEER; PERMIT REQUIRED. (a) In this section:

(1) "Property owners' association" has the meaning assigned by Section 202.001, Property Code.

(2) "Qualified individual" means an individual who has a wildlife management plan approved by the department.

(b) The department may issue to a qualified individual, a political subdivision, or a property owners' association a permit authorizing the trapping and transporting of surplus white-tailed deer found on the property owned by the qualified individual or within the boundaries of the political subdivision or the geographic area in which property subject to the property owners' association is located.

(c) Not later than the 30th day before the date of the first planned trapping and transporting of white-tailed deer, a qualified individual, a political subdivision, or a property owners' association shall file with the department an application showing that an overpopulation of white-tailed deer exists on the property owned by the qualified individual or within the boundaries of the political subdivision or the geographic area in which property subject to the property owners' association is located. If the department issues a permit to a requesting qualified individual, political subdivision, or property owners' association, the permit shall contain specific instructions detailing the location to which the trapped white-tailed deer are to be transported or transplanted.

(d) After receipt of an application, the department may issue to the qualified individual, political subdivision, or property owners' association a permit specifying:

(1) the location to which trapped white-tailed deer must be transported; and

(2) the purpose for which the trapped deer are to be used.

(e) The department may deny a qualified individual, a political subdivision, or a property owners' association a permit if no suitable destination for the trapped white-tailed deer exists.

(f) A qualified individual, a political subdivision, or a property owners' association trapping and transporting white-tailed deer under this section must make reasonable efforts to ensure:

(1) safe and humane handling of trapped white-tailed deer; and

(2) minimization of human health and safety hazards in every phase of the trapping and transporting of white-tailed deer.

(g) A permit issued under this section may authorize a qualified individual, a political subdivision, or a property owners' association to trap and transport white-tailed deer only between October 1 of a year and March 31 of the following year, unless white-tailed deer found on the property owned by the qualified individual or within the boundaries of the political subdivision or the geographic area in which property subject to the property owners' association is located pose a threat to human health or safety, in which case the provision of Subsection (e) does not apply and a permit may authorize the qualified individual, political subdivision, or property owners' association to trap and transport white-tailed deer at any time of the year.

(h) A permit issued under this section does not entitle a person to take, trap, or possess white-tailed deer found on any privately owned land without the landowner's written permission, unless the permit holder is the landowner.

(i) The state is not liable for and may not incur any expense for the trapping and transporting of white-tailed deer under a permit issued under this section.

(j) The department may not charge a fee for a white-tailed deer trapping and transporting permit issued under this section.

(k) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter, including rules which enhance the opportunity to relocate overpopulation of urban deer and relating to required notification, record-keeping, permit conditions, and the disposition of trapped white-tailed deer. The commission shall adopt rules for determining the circumstances under which a qualified individual, political subdivision, or property owners' association may obtain a permit issued under this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1241, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1220 (S.B. 498), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 43.062. PENALTY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person who violates any provision of this subchapter or the terms of a permit issued under this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) A person commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor if the person violates:

(1) a rule relating to a reporting requirement for a permit issued under this subchapter; or

(2) a term of a permit issued under this subchapter that relates to a reporting requirement.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 792 (S.B. 1432), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1025 (H.B. 2649), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER F. PRIVATE BIRD HUNTING AREAS

Sec. 43.071. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Private bird hunting area" means a tract of land on which the hunting or taking of pen-reared birds is authorized under this subchapter.

(2) "Licensee" means a person who holds a private bird hunting area license.

(3) "Guest" means a person other than a licensee who hunts or takes birds on a private bird hunting area.

(4) "Field trial" means the hunting of banded pen-reared birds in a formal trial of bird dogs that has been licensed or sanctioned by an organization or association of bird dog clubs, with or without the awarding of points.

(5) "Pen-reared birds" means bobwhite quail, pheasant, pigeons, partridge, and mallard ducks propagated or acquired under Chapter 45 of this code.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 22, Sec. 1, eff. Nov. 1, 1990.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 43.072. APPLICATION FOR LICENSE. (a) Any person may apply to the department for a private bird hunting area license.

(b) The application for a private bird hunting area license must be on a form supplied by the department and must include:

(1) the name and address of the applicant;

(2) the total number of contiguous acres to be licensed;

(3) the name and general location of the property; and

(4) the species of pen-reared birds to be hunted.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1330, ch. 277, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.0721. LICENSE REQUIRED. (a) No person may release banded pen-reared birds under this subchapter unless the person holds a valid private bird hunting area license.

(b) The license must be displayed on the private bird hunting area.

(c) A person is not required to hold a hunting lease license issued under Subchapter D to hunt banded pen-reared birds released under the authority of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 171, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 32, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.0722. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE; FEE; VALIDITY. (a) The department may issue a license for a private bird hunting area under this subchapter.

(b) The license shall be issued in the name of a person.

(c) The fee for a private bird hunting area license is $60 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(d) The department may not issue more than one private bird hunting area license for a single tract of land.

(e) A private bird hunting area license is valid only for the tract of land for which it is issued.

(f) The private bird hunting area license is valid from September 1 or another date set by the commission through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a license fee for a license issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this subchapter and provide for a license term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 22, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 43.073. AREA LIMITATIONS AND MARKINGS. (a) A private bird hunting area must consist of contiguous acreage owned by an individual, partnership, firm, or corporation.

(b) A private bird hunting area shall be distinguished from any other club, hunting lease, or other leased premises for hunting purposes by clearly marking its boundaries with wood, plastic, or metal signs bearing the words, "Private Bird Hunting Area," and the identification number. The lettering and identification number on these signs must be in block letters and arabic numbers not less than three inches high, and must be in a color that contrasts with the background.

(c) Signs must be placed at each entrance to a private bird hunting area to identify clearly the boundaries of each licensed area.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 992 (H.B. 2026), Sec. 8, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 992 (H.B. 2026), Sec. 9, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 43.074. TAKING OF PEN-REARED BIRDS AUTHORIZED. (a) A licensee or a guest may take banded pen-reared birds on a licensed private bird hunting area during the private bird hunting area season.

(b) The private bird hunting area season begins each September 1 and extends through the following August 31.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.075. GAME BIRDS IN CAPTIVITY; BANDING. (a) A licensee may hold pen-reared birds in captivity on the private bird hunting area only for release to provide hunting.

(b) All pen-reared birds released on a private bird hunting area shall be banded with a metal or plastic band before release.

(c) Each band must show the identification number of the licensee.

(d) The band must remain on each bird killed until the bird is taken to the permanent residence of the hunter, the permanent residence of another person receiving the bird, or a cold storage or processing facility unless the name and identification number of the licensee has been stamped or printed on the box, wrapping, or package containing the carcass of a bird that has been processed and possessed, shipped, or transported without the band attached.

(e) This subchapter may not be construed to exempt the holder of a private bird hunting area license from the requirement of a commercial game bird breeder's license if the pen-reared birds are propagated on the licensed area.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 33, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.076. LICENSE FORM. A private bird hunting area license must be on a form prescribed by the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.0762. REGULATIONS. The commission may adopt regulations necessary to administer this subchapter, including any provision, limitation, or prohibition necessary to manage and protect game birds occurring naturally in the wild.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.0763. APPLICATION FOR FIELD TRIAL PERMIT. (a) Any person, including a licensee, may apply to the department for a field trial permit.

(b) The application must be on a form prescribed by the department and must contain the following information:

(1) name and address of the applicant;

(2) name, address, and identification number of the licensee for the private bird hunting area at which the field trial is to be held;

(3) the species of birds to be used in the field trial; and

(4) the name of the association or organization of bird dog clubs licensing or sanctioning the field trial.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 171, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 171, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.0764. FIELD TRIAL PERMIT; FEE; VALIDITY. (a) No person, club, or organization may hold a field trial unless that person, club, or organization has in its immediate possession a valid field trial permit issued by the department.

(b) The fee for a field trial permit is $50 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more.

(c) A field trial permit shall be issued in the name of an individual.

(d) A field trial permit is valid for a period of nine consecutive days.

(e) A field trial permit is not valid for a tract of land or premises that is not licensed as a private bird hunting area.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.077. PENALTY. A person who violates any provision of this subchapter or a regulation of the commission under this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.078. HUNTING LICENSE REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, this subchapter does not authorize any person to hunt pen-reared birds on a licensed private bird hunting area without having in the person's immediate possession a hunting license required by Chapter 42 of this code.

(b) A person registered to participate in a field trial held under a field trial permit issued by the department is exempt, for the field trial, from the hunting license requirements of Chapter 42 of this code.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 512, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER G. PERMITS TO MANAGE WILDLIFE AND EXOTIC ANIMALS FROM AIRCRAFT

Sec. 43.101. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter and a proclamation or regulation of the commission adopted under this subchapter apply to all counties of the state.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1222, ch. 456, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1975; Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 568, ch. 202, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1977; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 255, ch. 133, Sec. 1, eff. May 9, 1979; Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 784, ch. 346, Sec. 1, eff. June 6, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 936, ch. 351, Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 1981; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 4706, ch. 819, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 730, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.102. PERMIT AUTHORIZED. Under Public Law 92-159, Section (b)(1) (85 Stat. 480, 16 U.S.C. 742j-1), the department may issue permits for the management of wildlife and exotic animals by the use of aircraft in this state.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.103. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Aircraft" means a mechanical or other device used for flight in the air.

(2) "Depredating animals" means bobcats, feral hogs, red foxes, coyotes, and crossbreeds between coyotes and dogs but does not include birds or fowl.

(3) "Exotic animals" includes exotic livestock and exotic fowl as defined by Section 161.001(a), Agriculture Code, wild animals that are nonindigenous to Texas, aoudad sheep, and elk.

(4) "Harass" means to disturb, worry, molest, harry, torment, rally, concentrate, drive, or herd.

(5) "Management by the use of aircraft" means counting, photographing, relocating, capturing, or hunting by the use of aircraft.

(6) "Wildlife" means any vertebrate species or their hybrids that normally live in a state of nature and are not ordinarily domesticated. This definition includes depredating animals.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 22, Sec. 2, eff. Nov. 1, 1990. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 424, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 863, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.104. GROUNDS TO ISSUE PERMIT. The department may issue a permit to any person if the department finds that management of wildlife or exotic animals by the use of aircraft is necessary to protect or to aid in the administration or protection of land, water, wildlife, livestock, domesticated animals, human life, or crops and will not have a deleterious effect on indigenous species.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.105. APPLICATION FOR PERMIT. (a) An applicant for a permit under this subchapter shall file with the application one or more affidavits, containing facts as well as opinion, as to why the permit should be issued for the management of wildlife or exotic animals by the use of aircraft.

(b) A permit holder under this subchapter must submit a landowner's authorization to manage wildlife or exotic animals to the department identifying the land to be managed and stating the kind and number of wildlife or exotic animals to be managed. The landowner's authorization may be submitted by a group of landowners or by an association on behalf of such landowners.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.106. FORM AND PERIOD OF VALIDITY OF PERMIT; RENEWAL. (a) The department shall prescribe the form and manner of issuance of, and periods of validity and renewal dates for, permits and landowner's authorizations authorized by this subchapter.

(b) A landowner agreement application to manage wildlife or exotic animals may be approved by the department for the time period required to complete the management activity but not for less than one year.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.107. REPORTS REQUIRED. (a) The holder of a permit under this subchapter shall report to the department in the time and manner required by commission proclamation.

(b) An offense under this section may be prosecuted in the county in which the defendant resides or in the county where the offense took place.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.1075. USING HELICOPTERS TO TAKE CERTAIN ANIMALS. A qualified landowner or landowner's agent, as determined by commission rule, may contract to participate as a hunter or observer in using a helicopter to take depredating feral hogs or coyotes under the authority of a permit issued under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 481 (H.B. 716), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 43.1076. USING HOT AIR BALLOONS TO TAKE CERTAIN ANIMALS. A qualified landowner or landowner's agent, as determined by commission rule, may contract to participate as a hunter or observer in using a hot air balloon to take depredating feral hogs or coyotes under the authority of a permit issued under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 706 (H.B. 3535), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 43.108. REPORTS BY DEPARTMENT. The department shall report annually to the Secretary of the Interior of the United States as required by federal law.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 43.109. REGULATIONS. (a) The commission may make regulations governing management of wildlife or exotic animals by the use of aircraft under this subchapter.

(b) A proclamation or regulation of the commission adopted under this subchapter may:

(1) prescribe forms and procedures for permit applications;

(2) establish procedures for the management of wildlife or exotic animals by the use of aircraft;

(3) limit the time and the place for which a permit is valid;

(4) prohibit acts; and

(5) require, limit, or prohibit any activity as necessary to implement this subchapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.1095. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) For purposes of this subchapter, a person commits an offense if that person:

(1) hunts or kills, or attempts to hunt or kill, from an aircraft any animal or bird that is not specifically authorized by a permit issued under this subchapter;

(2) uses an aircraft to manage wildlife or exotic animals without first obtaining and having in the person's immediate possession a permit and a landowner's authorization for the management of wildlife or exotic animals by the use of aircraft; or

(3) uses an aircraft to harass wildlife, exotic animals, or any other animal or bird.

(b) It is a defense to prosecution for harassment of wildlife or exotic animals under this section if the person is engaged in the activity of counting, photographing, relocating, capturing, or hunting wildlife or exotic animals under the authority of a permit under this subchapter.

(c) Nothing in this chapter authorizes a person to hunt any animal or bird from an aircraft for sport.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.110. PERMIT FEE. The commission shall set a fee for a permit that authorizes the management of wildlife or exotic animals by the use of aircraft.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.111. PENALTY. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a person who violates any provision of this subchapter or a proclamation or regulation adopted under this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) A person who violates Section 43.107 commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(c) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant for a violation of this subchapter or a proclamation or regulation adopted under this subchapter that the defendant has been convicted of a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor violation of this subchapter within 10 years preceding the trial date, on conviction the defendant shall be punished for a Parks and Wildlife Code felony. This subsection does not apply if the previous conviction was for a violation of Section 43.107.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 969, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER H. PERMITS TO CONTROL WILDLIFE PROTECTED BY THIS CODE

Sec. 43.151. THREATS TO PUBLIC SAFETY OR DAMAGE BY WILDLIFE. A person who has evidence clearly showing that wildlife protected by this code is causing serious damage to commercial agricultural, horticultural, or aquicultural interests, or is a threat to public safety, and who desires to kill the protected wildlife shall give written notice of the facts to the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.1515. RULES. The commission may adopt rules to implement this subchapter, including rules governing:

(1) reports that must be submitted to the department by a person who holds a permit issued by the department under this subchapter;

(2) the reinstatement of a canceled permit and a fee for the reinstatement;

(3) the possession of wildlife resources taken or held under this subchapter;

(4) the circumstances required to qualify for a permit; and

(5) the electronic issuance of permits.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 2, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.152. DEPARTMENT INSPECTION. (a) On receiving notice from a person under Section 43.151, the department may inspect the property and determine if damage or a threat to public safety is occurring as alleged in the notice.

(b) If the notice received by the department under Section 43.151 alleges damage or a threat to public safety caused by mule deer, pronghorn antelope, or desert bighorn sheep, the department may not issue a permit under Section 43.154 unless the department inspects the property and determines whether serious damage or a threat to public safety is occurring.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 3, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.153. APPLICATION FOR PERMIT. (a) A person who has evidence of damage by depredation or threat to public safety may file with the department an application for a permit to kill the protected wildlife.

(b) The application must be in writing, be sworn to by the applicant, and contain:

(1) a statement of facts relating to the damage or threat; and

(2) an agreement by the applicant to comply with the provisions of this subchapter and any rules adopted by the commission under this subchapter.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251, Sec. 10, eff. May 29, 2009.

(d) The application must be accompanied by a permit application fee of $50 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. Proceeds from the fee shall be deposited in the special game, fish, and water safety account.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 4, eff. May 29, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 10, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.154. PERMIT. (a) On receipt of an application, the department may issue a permit for the killing of wildlife without regard to the closed season, bag limit, or means and methods. As soon as practicable, but not later than the 10th business day after the date the department receives an application, the department shall approve or deny the application and, if the application is approved, issue the permit.

(a-1) The department may not issue a permit under this section for the killing of mule deer, pronghorn antelope, or desert bighorn sheep unless:

(1) the department has inspected the property and has verified that serious damage or a threat to public safety as described in the notice under Section 43.151 is occurring;

(2) the department has made recommendations to the applicant regarding ways to minimize the damage or threat; and

(3) the applicant has made a reasonable effort to comply with the recommendations made by the department under this section.

(b) The department shall deliver or mail the permit, if issued, to the person requesting the permit or to the regional or local office of the department for pickup by the person. The department may issue the permit electronically.

(c) A permit must specify:

(1) the period of time during which it is valid;

(2) the area in which it applies;

(3) the kind and number of wildlife authorized to be killed; and

(4) the persons permitted to kill the noxious wildlife.

(d) No state permit is required to authorize a person to kill migratory birds protected by the Federal Migratory Bird Treaty Act if the person has obtained a permit authorizing that activity from the United States Department of the Interior or the United States Department of Agriculture.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 5, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.155. DISPOSITION OF WILDLIFE. (a) The holder of a permit issued under this subchapter or a person designated by Section 43.154(c)(4) who kills wildlife under the authority of the permit shall dispose of the carcass by donating it to a charitable institution, a hospital, a needy person, or any other appropriate recipient.

(b) The permit holder or a person designated under Section 43.154(c)(4) may not keep or sell any part of the wildlife taken under this subchapter, including antlers.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 6, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.156. CANCELLATION OF PERMIT. The department may cancel a permit if:

(1) the permit does not accomplish its intended purposes;

(2) the permit holder fails to submit a required report to the department; or

(3) the permit holder intentionally made false claims on the application for the permit.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 7, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.1565. REINSTATEMENT OF PERMIT. The department may reinstate a canceled permit if the permit holder submits an application for reinstatement in the same manner as required by Section 43.153 for an original permit and pays a fee set by the commission.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 8, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.157. VIOLATIONS; PENALTY. (a) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251, Sec. 10, eff. May 29, 2009.

(b) No permittee may dispose of a wildlife carcass killed under the permit or allow the wildlife to be disposed of except as allowed under Section 43.155 of this code.

(c) No permittee may violate a term or condition of the permit.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (e), a person who violates this section commits an offense that is a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(e) A person who violates a reporting requirement adopted under this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 9, eff. May 29, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 251 (H.B. 1965), Sec. 10, eff. May 29, 2009.

Sec. 43.158. LANDOWNER PERMIT EXEMPTION. Nothing in this subchapter prevents a landowner or the landowner's agent or lessee from taking depredating feral hogs on the landowner's land without having acquired a permit under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 809, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER I. ARCHERY STAMPS

Sec. 43.201. ARCHERY STAMP REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c) or (d), no person may hunt deer, turkey, or javelina (collared peccary) during an open archery season provided by law or by the proclamations of the commission and during which season only crossbows, longbows, recurved bows, and compound bows may be used unless the person has acquired an archery hunting stamp issued to the person by the department. The commission by rule may prescribe requirements relating to possessing a stamp required by this subchapter. In a county that does not permit hunting with a firearm, a hunter may use a crossbow only if the hunter is a person with upper limb disabilities and has an archery hunting stamp.

(b) The stamp shall be issued in the form and manner prescribed by the department and, except as provided by Subsection (d), must be signed on its face by the person using the stamp for the stamp to be valid for hunting purposes.

(c) The commission by regulation may exempt a person from the stamp requirement of this section.

(d) The commission by rule may prescribe alternate requirements for identifying the purchaser of a stamp issued in an automated manner.

(e) A stamp issued under this subchapter is valid for hunting only during the yearly period for which the stamp is issued without regard to the date on which the stamp is acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a stamp fee for a stamp issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this subchapter and provide for a stamp term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

Added by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1203, ch. 456, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 24, eff. June 16, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (H.B. 968), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 43.202. FEE. The fee for an archery hunting stamp is $6 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. The department may issue other editions of the stamp that are not valid for hunting at an amount set by the commission.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1203, ch. 456, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1330, ch. 277, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 25, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 43.203. HUNTING LICENSE REQUIRED. The purchase or possession of an archery hunting stamp does not permit a person to hunt deer, turkey, or javelina without the license required by Chapter 42 or by any means or methods not allowed by law.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1203, ch. 456, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.204. STAMP SALE RECEIPTS. The net revenue derived from the sale of archery hunting stamps shall be sent to the department.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1203, ch. 456, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 548, ch. 260, art. 1, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Sec. 43.205. PENALTY. (a) A person who violates Section 43.201 of this code commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) A person hunting a species covered by this chapter during an open archery season who fails or refuses on the demand of any game warden or other peace officer to exhibit an archery hunting stamp or proof that the person is eligible for any exemptions provided by Section 43.201(c) is presumed to be in violation of Section 43.201 of this code.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1203, ch. 456, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER L. DEER BREEDER'S PERMIT

Sec. 43.351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Breeder deer" means a white-tailed deer or mule deer legally held under a permit authorized by this subchapter.

(2) "Deer breeder" means a person holding a valid deer breeder's permit.

(3) "Captivity" means the keeping of a breeder deer in an enclosure suitable for and capable of retaining the breeder deer it is designed to retain at all times under reasonable and ordinary circumstances and to prevent entry by another deer. The term includes the temporary keeping of a breeder deer in a vehicle or trailer.

(4) "Deer" means a white-tailed deer or mule deer.

(5) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 603 (S.B. 810), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

(6) "Immediate locality" means land that is contiguous and that is owned by the same person. For purposes of this subdivision, land divided or separated only by a public road or a public waterway is contiguous.

(7) "Transfer" means any movement of breeder deer from a breeder facility, a nursing facility, or a deer management permit facility other than to an accredited veterinarian for medical purposes.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 603 (S.B. 810), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.352. PERMIT AUTHORIZED; DURATION OF PERMIT. (a) The department shall issue a permit to a qualified person to possess live breeder deer in captivity.

(b) At the option of the person applying for the issuance or renewal of a permit under this section, the department may issue a permit that is valid for one year, three years, or five years.

(c) A three-year or five-year permit is available only to a person who:

(1) has held a deer breeder's permit for the three consecutive permit years immediately preceding the date of the application for a three-year or five-year permit;

(2) agrees to submit the annual reports required under this subchapter electronically; and

(3) meets any other criteria established by rule of the commission.

(d) The commission may adopt rules allowing the department to revoke a three-year or five-year permit before the date specified for expiration of the permit if the permit holder fails to submit the annual reports electronically as required.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (S.B. 820), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.353. PERMIT IS DEFENSE. In any prosecution for the unlawful possession or transportation of white-tailed deer or mule deer, the possession of a permit issued under this subchapter to the accused is a complete defense if the conduct was authorized under the terms of the permit.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.356. SERIAL NUMBER. The department shall issue a serial number to a permittee when the department issues the permittee a deer breeder's permit. The same serial number shall be assigned to the permittee if the department issues the permittee a subsequent deer breeder's permit.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1255, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.3561. IDENTIFICATION OF BREEDER DEER. (a) In this section:

(1) "Button back" means the portion of an identification tag used to secure the tag to the breeder deer.

(2) "Electronic identification device" means a button tag or implant that uses radio frequency identification technology.

(3) "Identification tag" means a tag attached to the ear of a breeder deer for the purposes of identification that meets the requirements of this section.

(4) "Unique identifier" means five alphanumeric characters assigned by the department to uniquely identify a breeder deer.

(b) Not later than March 31 of the year following the year in which a breeder deer is born, the breeder deer must be identified by:

(1) attaching an identification tag to the pinna of either ear of the breeder deer in a manner so that the face of the tag is clearly visible on the anterior side of the ear; and

(2) applying a single electronic identification device.

(c) Except for a replacement identification tag described by Subsection (h), an identification tag applied under Subsection (b):

(1) must:

(A) be commercially manufactured;

(B) bear on the face and button back the unique identifier for the breeder deer to which it is attached in text placed by the manufacturer with characters on the face not less than 5/16 inch wide and 1/2 inch tall and spaced not less than 1/16 inch apart;

(C) be securely affixed so as not to be dislodged or removed easily;

(D) be made of a material that is not likely to disintegrate or decompose; and

(E) have sufficient contrast between the color of the text and the color of the tag to make the text characters clearly visible; and

(2) may bear additional information, provided that a dividing line placed by the manufacturer below the unique identifier separates the unique identifier from the additional information.

(d) The text of the unique identifier may be larger than the dimensions described by Subsection (c)(1)(B) but must maintain the same proportion of height and width.

(e) A breeder deer born before January 1, 2022, may be identified as described by Subsection (c) or (h). A breeder deer born on or after January 1, 2022, must be identified first as described by Subsection (c) before the breeder deer may be identified as described by Subsection (h).

(f) An electronic identification device applied under Subsection (b)(2) must be approved by the United States Department of Agriculture and have an associated 15-digit animal identification number that begins with 840. If the electronic identification device is a button tag, the button tag must be attached to the pinna of either ear of the breeder deer. If the electronic identification device is an implant, the implant may not be implanted in edible muscle. No person may remove an electronic identification device.

(g) The department shall create and maintain a database containing electronic identification device numbers entered by deer breeders. An electronic identification device applied under Subsection (b)(2) is valid for purposes of Subsection (b) only if the number associated with the device has been entered into the department database and corresponds with the unique identifier assigned to the breeder deer to or in which the device is attached or implanted. In making a determination to destroy a deer under Section 43.953, the department shall consider an electronic identification device that meets the requirements of this section as evidence of positive identification for a breeder deer that cannot be identified by either the identification tag or tattoo required by Subsection (b) or (j), provided that the deer breeder entered the electronic identification device number into the database before the identity of the breeder deer was in question as determined by the department.

(h) A deer breeder immediately shall replace an identification tag that has been dislodged, damaged, or removed by means other than human agency to the extent that the identification tag does not meet the requirements of Subsections (b) and (c) with another identification tag that meets the requirements of Subsections (b) and (c), except that a deer breeder may create and attach a replacement identification tag. A replacement identification tag must:

(1) be clearly visible;

(2) have legible text written with a tag pen manufactured for use with the tag; and

(3) meet the requirements of Subsections (b)(1) and (c), except for the requirement that the text be placed on the tag by the manufacturer.

(i) A deer breeder is not required to remove the tag for any purpose but may remove the tag and replace the tag immediately to meet the requirements of this section.

(j) A person may not remove or knowingly permit the removal of a breeder deer held in a facility by a permittee under this subchapter unless the breeder deer has been identified by applying a tattoo to the inner portion of either ear of the deer that:

(1) is made with commercially available #300 or 5/16 inch tattoo letters and numbers;

(2) is legible, permanent, and green or black; and

(3) bears the same unique identifier printed on the identification tag attached to the deer under Subsection (c).

(k) A person may not knowingly accept or permit the acceptance of a breeder deer into a facility regulated under this subchapter unless the breeder deer has been identified as required by this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2008.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 603 (S.B. 810), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.357. PERMIT PRIVILEGES; REGULATIONS. (a) The holder of a valid deer breeder's permit may:

(1) engage in the business of breeding breeder deer in the immediate locality for which the permit was issued; and

(2) sell, transfer to another person, or hold in captivity live breeder deer for the purpose of propagation or sale.

(a-1) A deer breeder, a deer breeder's authorized agent, or an assistant who is not a permittee under this subchapter but is acting under the direction of a deer breeder or a deer breeder's authorized agent may capture a breeder deer held in a permitted facility for:

(1) removal from an enclosure;

(2) veterinary treatment;

(3) tagging;

(4) euthanasia for the purpose of:

(A) humane dispatch of the breeder deer; or

(B) the conduct of a test for a reportable disease as required by law; or

(5) any other purpose required or allowed by law.

(b) The commission may make regulations governing:

(1) the possession of breeder deer held under the authority of this subchapter;

(2) the recapture of lawfully possessed breeder deer that have escaped from the facility of a deer breeder;

(3) permit applications and fees;

(4) reporting requirements;

(5) procedures and requirements for the purchase, transfer, sale, or shipment of breeder deer;

(6) the endorsement of a deer breeder facility by a certified wildlife biologist;

(7) the number of breeder deer that a deer breeder may possess; and

(8) the dates for which a deer breeder permit is valid.

(c) A person who holds a permit under this subchapter or a person who receives a breeder deer under this subchapter is not required to have the release site inspected or approved before the release of a breeder deer from a breeding facility. This section does not preclude the department from making a habitat inspection but does direct the department to refrain from implementing habitat inspection rules or procedures that could unreasonably impede the broader deer breeding industry.

(d) Subsection (c) does not exempt a person from the requirements under the following permits issued by the department:

(1) managed land deer permit regulated under 31 T.A.C. Sections 65.26 and 65.34;

(2) deer management permit under Section 43.601;

(3) trap, transport, and transplant permit under Sections 43.061 and 43.0611;

(4) trap, transport, and process permit under Section 43.0612; and

(5) antlerless deer control permit regulated under 31 T.A.C. Sections 65.25 and 65.27.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 13, 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1255, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.358. INSPECTION. An authorized employee of the department may inspect at any time and without warrant:

(1) any pen, coop, or enclosure holding white-tailed deer or mule deer; or

(2) any records required to be maintained under Section 43.359(a).

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1255, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.359. RECORDS AND REPORTS. (a) A deer breeder shall maintain an accurate and legible record of all breeder deer acquired, purchased, propagated, sold, transferred, or disposed of and any other information required by the department that reasonably relates to the regulation of deer breeders.

(b) A deer breeder shall report the information maintained under Subsection (a) to the department as the commission by rule may require.

(c) On the request of a game warden acting within the scope of the game warden's authority, a deer breeder shall make any information required under this subchapter for the previous two reporting years available to:

(1) the game warden; or

(2) another authorized department employee.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1255, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.3591. GENETIC TESTING. (a) In this section:

(1) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.

(2) "Genetic test" means a laboratory analysis of a deer's genes, gene products, or chromosomes that:

(A) analyzes the deer's DNA, RNA, proteins, or chromosomes; and

(B) is performed to determine genetically the deer's ancestral lineage or descendants.

(3) "RNA" means ribonucleic acid.

(b) After an inspection, the department shall notify a deer breeder in writing when the department has reason to believe the deer breeder possesses deer that may pose a disease risk to other deer. The notice must include an explanation of the rationale used to establish the disease risk.

(c) If genetic testing is timely conducted, the department must postpone any actions that may be affected by the test results until the test results are available.

(d) The results of genetic testing may not be used as evidence to establish a defense against a fine imposed on a deer breeder found guilty of failure to keep records of all deer in a deer breeder facility as required by this subchapter.

(e) The commission shall adopt rules as needed to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (S.B. 820), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.360. ENCLOSURE SIZE. A single enclosure for breeder deer may not contain more than 100 acres.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.361. RELEASE SITES. (a) A release site onto which breeder deer are liberated must be surrounded by a fence not less than seven feet in height that is capable of retaining deer at all times under reasonable and ordinary circumstances.

(b) The owner of a release site is responsible for ensuring that the fence surrounding the release site and infrastructure associated with the fence are in a condition to retain deer as provided by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 611 (S.B. 948), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.362. TRANSFER, PURCHASE, OR SALE OF LIVE BREEDER DEER. (a) Only breeder deer that are in a healthy condition may be sold, transferred, bartered, or exchanged, or offered for sale, transfer, barter, or exchange, by a deer breeder.

(b) Except as provided by Subchapter C or by a rule adopted by the commission under this subchapter, no person may purchase, obtain, sell, transfer, or accept in this state a live breeder deer unless the person obtains a transfer permit from the department.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1255, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.363. TRANSFER DURING OPEN SEASON. (a) During an open hunting season for deer or during the 10-day period immediately preceding an open hunting season, no person in this state may sell, transfer, ship, or transport a breeder deer unless the person:

(1) has removed the antlers of the breeder deer between the G-3 tine, as defined by the Boone and Crockett Club, and the pedicel on each antler main beam; and

(2) has followed any procedure prescribed by rule of the commission for the lawful conduct of activities under this subchapter.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a sale, transfer, shipment, or transport:

(1) to another deer breeder's facility; or

(2) to an enclosure authorized under a deer management permit.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules governing a transfer permit under this section.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 456, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 21, 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1255, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 43, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.364. USE OF BREEDER DEER. Breeder deer may be purchased, sold, transferred, or received in this state only for the purposes of liberation or holding for propagation. All breeder deer and increase from breeder deer are under the full force of the laws of this state pertaining to deer, and those breeder deer may be held in captivity for propagation in this state only after a deer breeder's permit is issued by the department under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.365. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) It is an offense if a deer breeder or another person:

(1) allows the hunting or killing of a breeder deer or any other deer held in captivity in a facility permitted under this subchapter, except as provided by this subchapter or a rule adopted by the commission under this subchapter; or

(2) knowingly sells, arranges the sale of, purchases, transfers, receives, or attempts to sell, arrange the sale of, purchase, transfer, or receive a live breeder deer in violation of this subchapter or a rule adopted by the commission under this subchapter.

(b) It is an offense if a deer breeder fails to furnish to a game warden commissioned by the department or other authorized department employee records for the previous two reporting years required to be maintained under Section 43.359(a).

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1255, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.366. APPLICATION OF OTHER LAWS. (a) In order that native species may be preserved, breeder deer held under a deer breeder's permit are subject to all laws and regulations of this state pertaining to deer except as specifically provided in this subchapter.

(b) This subchapter may not be construed to restrict or prohibit the use of high fences.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.367. PENALTY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person who violates a provision of this subchapter or a regulation of the commission issued under this subchapter or who fails to file a full and complete report as required by Section 43.359 commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) A person who violates Section 43.365(a)(1) commits an offense that is a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 1308), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.369. DEER BREEDER DATABASE. (a) In this section, "database" means a deer breeder database used by the department.

(b) The department in conjunction with the Texas Animal Health Commission, not later than June 1, 2010, shall develop and maintain a process for a database to be shared by both agencies. The database must include the reporting data required to be provided by each deer breeder:

(1) to the department under this subchapter; and

(2) to the Texas Animal Health Commission.

(c) To the extent possible, the department and the Texas Animal Health Commission shall share the database to eliminate the need for a deer breeder to submit duplicate reports to the two agencies.

(d) The Parks and Wildlife Commission and the Texas Animal Health Commission, by rule, shall provide incentives to deer breeders whose cooperation results in reduced costs and increased efficiency by offering:

(1) reduced fees for the deer breeder permit; and

(2) a permit with an extended duration.

(e) The Parks and Wildlife Commission and the Texas Animal Health Commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (S.B. 1586), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER M. SALTWATER SPORTFISHING STAMP

Sec. 43.401. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "saltwater" has the meaning prescribed by Section 66.001 of this code.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 43.402. SALTWATER SPORTFISHING STAMP REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or (c) of this section, no person may engage in fishing in saltwater for sporting purposes in this state, or unload in this state fish or other aquatic life taken for sporting purposes from waters managed by the Gulf of Mexico Fishery Management Council established under the Fishery Conservation and Management Act of 1976 (16 U.S.C. Section 1801 et seq.), unless the person has acquired a saltwater sportfishing stamp endorsement issued to the person by the department. The commission by rule may prescribe requirements relating to possessing a stamp endorsement required by this subchapter.

(b) A person who is exempted from obtaining a fishing license under Chapter 46 is not required to obtain a saltwater sportfishing stamp endorsement.

(c) The commission by regulation may exempt a person from the stamp requirement of this section.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 32, eff. June 16, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 40, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.403. DESIGN AND ISSUANCE OF STAMP. (a) The department may issue a saltwater sportfishing stamp to any person on the payment to the department of $5 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. The department may issue other editions of the stamp that are not valid for fishing at an amount set by the commission. Except as provided by Subsection (d), the stamp must be signed on its face by the person using the stamp for the stamp to be valid for fishing purposes.

(b) The commission shall prescribe by regulation the form, design, and manner of issuance of the saltwater sportfishing stamp. The department shall retain the reproduction rights to the design.

(c) The commission may contract with and pay a person for designing and producing the saltwater sportfishing stamp authorized by this subchapter.

(d) The commission by rule may prescribe alternate requirements for identifying the purchaser of a stamp issued in an automated manner.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 33, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 43.4035. EXPIRATION OF STAMP. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or (c), a stamp issued under this subchapter is valid for fishing only during the yearly period for which the stamp is issued without regard to the date on which the stamp is acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a stamp fee for a stamp issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this subchapter and provide for a stamp term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

(b) A saltwater sportfishing stamp issued before September 1 or another date set by the commission that does not expire until August 31 of the following year or another date set by the commission is valid from the date of issuance through August 31 of the following year or another date set by the commission.

(c) A saltwater sportfishing stamp issued in conjunction with a license issued under Section 46.005 or 46.0051 of this code expires at the same time the license expires or on the expiration date printed on the stamp, whichever is later.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 838, Sec. 18, eff. July 15, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 34, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 43.404. FISHING LICENSE REQUIRED. The acquisition of a saltwater sportfishing stamp does not authorize a person to fish for sporting purposes in saltwater without having acquired a fishing license required by Chapter 46 of this code or authorize saltwater sportfishing at any time or by any means not otherwise authorized by this code.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 43.405. COLLECTION FEES. (a) After deduction of the collection fee, the net receipts from stamp sales shall be sent to the department.

(b) The stamp sale net receipts shall be spent for coastal fisheries enforcement and management and are hereby appropriated for such purposes.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 35, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 43.406. REFUSAL TO SHOW STAMP. A person fishing in saltwater for sporting purposes who refuses on demand of any game warden or peace officer to show a saltwater sportfishing stamp is presumed to be in violation of Section 43.402.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 78 (H.B. 1346), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2011.

Sec. 43.407. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 43.402 of this code is guilty of a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER O. CONSERVATION PERMITS

Sec. 43.521. CONSERVATION PERMIT REQUIRED. (a) The department may require one person in each vehicle using land under the control of the department that is open to the public to possess a conservation permit issued to the person by the department or its agent under this subchapter. For the purpose of this subchapter, a use of land includes any use for a consumptive or nonconsumptive purpose.

(b) The department may require each person to possess a conservation permit to participate in certain activities and to enter certain facilities designated as wildlife management areas, state natural areas or lands that have not been fully developed.

(c) A person is not required to possess a conservation permit for use of land under the department's control for hunting purposes if the person possesses a current Type II hunting permit issued by the department.

(d) A person is not required to possess a conservation permit at Washington-on-the-Brazos or San Jacinto State Parks or to attend musical or theatrical productions at Galveston Island or Palo Duro State Parks.

(e) A person is not required to possess a conservation permit to utilize a state park for day use.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.522. ISSUANCE AND EXPIRATION OF CONSERVATION PERMIT. (a) The department or its agent may issue a conservation permit to any person on the payment to the department or agent of a fee in an amount set by the commission.

(b) A conservation permit expires on the first anniversary of the date on which it is issued.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.523. OTHER PERMITS REQUIRED. Possession of a conservation permit does not relieve the holder of the requirement for holding any other permit or paying any other fee or charge for the entrance to or use of land under the department's control that is authorized by law or rule of the commission, including Chapters 12, 21, and 81 of this code, however, the department may grant discounts on charges for entrance and use of land to holders of conservation permits.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.524. DISPOSITION OF CONSERVATION PERMIT FEES. (a) After deducting any collection fee, an agent of the department shall send to the department the net receipts from the sale of conservation permits.

(b) The department may use the net receipts from the sale of conservation permits for the sole purpose of acquiring, leasing, or developing state lands, paying principal and interest on Texas Park Development Bonds, or operating land or facilities under the department's control.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 40, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 43.525. FAILURE OR REFUSAL TO SHOW CONSERVATION PERMIT; PENALTY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person commits an offense if the person is using land under the department's control and fails or refuses to show a conservation permit issued to the person on the demand of a game warden, peace officer, or department employee.

(b) It is not an offense under Subsection (a) if a person who is using land under the department's control fails to show a conservation permit on the demand of a game warden, peace officer, or department employee, and that person:

(1) entered land under the department's control as an occupant of a privately owned, noncommercial vehicle in which at least one other occupant possesses and is able to show a conservation permit issued to that other occupant; or

(2) is a member of a group of individuals that the department has exempted from the requirement for a conservation permit.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 78 (H.B. 1346), Sec. 2, eff. May 19, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER P. FISH STOCK PERMIT

Sec. 43.551. PERMIT FOR THE TAKING OF BROOD STOCK BY COMMERCIAL AQUACULTURE FACILITIES. The department may issue a permit to an operator of a commercial aquaculture facility as defined by Section 134.001, Agriculture Code, that authorizes the operator to take a specified quantity of fish brood stock from specified public water.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 42, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.552. COMMISSION RULES. The commission by rule shall prescribe the requirements and conditions for issuance of a permit authorized by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.553. QUANTITY THAT MAY BE TAKEN. (a) A permit under this subchapter may allow the operator of a commercial aquaculture facility to take a specified quantity of fish brood stock reasonably necessary for the operation of the aquaculture facility but limited to the extent necessary to protect the availability of fish in public water.

(b) The commission's rules must set guidelines regarding reasonable quantities of fish brood stock that may be taken under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 43, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.554. FEES. The commission shall charge the operator of a commercial aquaculture facility a fee equal to the value of the fish authorized to be taken under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 703), Sec. 44, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.555. PENALTIES. A person who violates this subchapter or a commission rule issued under this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER R. WHITE-TAILED DEER MANAGEMENT PERMITS

Sec. 43.601. PERMIT FOR DEER MANAGEMENT. (a) The department may issue a permit for the management of the wild white-tailed deer population on acreage enclosed by a fence capable of retaining white-tailed deer (under reasonable and ordinary circumstances) and capable of preventing entry by a white-tailed deer.

(b) The deer managed under the permit remain the property of the people of the state, and the holder of the permit is considered to be managing the population on behalf of the state.

(c) If a special season with a special bag limit is established by the commission for holders of a deer management permit, the holder of the permit may not receive compensation for granting any other person permission to kill a wild deer during that special season on the acreage covered by the permit.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.602. MANAGEMENT PLAN. (a) The holder of a deer management permit must annually submit a deer management plan for approval or disapproval of the department. The management plan must provide for specific management practices to be applied to the deer population on the acreage, which may include, in addition to other practices:

(1) the temporary detention within an enclosure on the acreage covered by the permit of wild white-tailed deer for the purpose of propagation with other wild deer, and the release of those deer on that acreage;

(2) the killing of wild deer in open seasons established by the commission in a number set in the management plan; or

(3) the killing of wild deer during a special season having a special bag limit established by the commission for this permit.

(b) A management plan approved by the department must be consistent with the regulatory responsibilities of the commission under Chapter 61.

(c) A management plan may not authorize the killing of wild deer within an enclosure designed for the temporary detention of wild deer under Subsection (a)(1).

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.603. CONDITIONS; DURATION; FEE. (a) A permit issued under this subchapter is subject to conditions established by the commission, including conditions governing:

(1) the number of deer that may be killed on the property by a single person;

(2) the number and type of deer that may be killed or taken under the permit; and

(3) the number, type, and length of time that deer may be temporarily detained in an enclosure.

(b) The permit is valid for a period prescribed by the department of not less than one year.

(c) The department shall set a fee for the issuance or renewal of a permit in an amount not to exceed $1,000.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.604. INSPECTION. An authorized employee of the department may inspect at any time without warrant the records required by Section 43.605 and the acreage for which the permit is issued for the purpose of determining the permit holder's compliance with the management plan.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.605. RECORDS. The holder of a permit issued under this subchapter shall maintain, in a form prescribed by the department, an accurate record showing:

(1) the number of white-tailed deer taken during the general open seasons and during any special seasons;

(2) the number of white-tailed deer temporarily detained and released during the permit period; and

(3) any other information required by the department that reasonably relates to the activities covered by the permit.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.606. APPLICATION OF GENERAL LAWS. Except as expressly provided by this subchapter and the terms and conditions of the permit and management plan, the general laws and regulations of this state applicable to white-tailed deer apply to deer on the acreage covered by the permit. This subchapter does not restrict or prohibit the use of high fences on acreage not covered by a management plan.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.607. PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) violates a provision of this subchapter or a regulation of the department adopted under this subchapter;

(2) violates a condition of permit imposed under Section 43.603(a);

(3) fails to maintain records required by Section 43.605; or

(4) kills or allows to be killed a deer temporarily detained under Section 43.602(a)(1).

(b) An offense under Subsections (a)(1)-(3) is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(c) An offense under Subsection (a)(4) is a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER R-1. MULE DEER MANAGEMENT PERMITS

Sec. 43.621. PERMIT FOR DEER MANAGEMENT. (a) The department may issue a permit for the management of the wild mule deer population.

(b) The deer managed under the permit remain the property of the people of the state, and the holder of the permit is considered to be managing the population on behalf of the state.

(c) If a special season with a special bag limit is established by the commission for holders of a deer management permit, the holder of the permit may receive compensation for granting a person permission to kill a wild deer during that special season on the acreage covered by the permit.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 43.622. MANAGEMENT PLAN. (a) The holder of a deer management permit must annually submit a deer management plan for approval or disapproval of the department. The management plan must provide for specific management practices to be applied to the deer population on the acreage, which may include, in addition to other practices:

(1) the detention, for a period not to exceed 16 months, within an enclosure on the acreage covered by the permit, of wild mule deer for the purpose of propagation with other wild deer or breeder deer, and the release of those deer on that acreage;

(2) the killing of wild deer in open seasons established by the commission in a number set in the management plan; or

(3) the killing of wild deer during a special season having a special bag limit established by the commission for this permit.

(b) A management plan approved by the department must be consistent with the regulatory responsibilities of the commission under Chapter 61.

(c) A management plan may not authorize the killing of wild deer within an enclosure designed for the temporary detention of wild deer under Subsection (a)(1).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 43.623. CONDITIONS; DURATION; FEE. (a) A permit issued under this subchapter is subject to conditions established by the commission, including conditions governing:

(1) the number of deer that may be killed on the property by a single person;

(2) the number and type of deer that may be killed or taken under the permit;

(3) the number and type of deer that may be temporarily detained in an enclosure; and

(4) the length of time that deer may be temporarily detained in an enclosure.

(b) The permit is valid for a period prescribed by the department of not less than one year.

(c) The department shall set a fee for the issuance or renewal of a permit in an amount not to exceed $1,000.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 43.624. INSPECTION. An authorized employee of the department may inspect at any time without warrant the records required by Section 43.625 and the acreage for which the permit is issued for the purpose of determining the permit holder's compliance with the management plan.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 43.625. RECORDS. The holder of a permit issued under this subchapter shall maintain, in a form prescribed by the department, an accurate record showing:

(1) the number of mule deer taken during the general open seasons and during any special seasons;

(2) the number of mule deer temporarily detained and released during the permit period; and

(3) any other information required by the department that reasonably relates to the activities covered by the permit.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 43.626. APPLICATION OF GENERAL LAWS. Except as expressly provided by this subchapter and the terms of the permit and management plan, the general laws and regulations of this state applicable to mule deer apply to deer on the acreage covered by the permit. This subchapter does not restrict or prohibit the use of high fences.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 43.627. PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) violates this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter;

(2) violates a condition of permit imposed under Section 43.623(a);

(3) fails to maintain records required by Section 43.625; or

(4) kills or allows to be killed a deer temporarily detained under Section 43.622(a)(1).

(b) An offense under Subsections (a)(1)-(3) is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(c) An offense under Subsection (a)(4) is a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 460), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER S. MIGRATORY AND UPLAND GAME BIRD STAMPS

Sec. 43.651. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Migratory game bird" means any bird listed in Section 64.021 and includes any other species of migratory bird that the commission by rule designates as a migratory game bird.

(2) "Upland game bird" means any bird listed in Section 64.001, other than a bird that is also listed in Section 64.021, and includes any other species of upland game bird that the commission by rule designates as an upland game bird.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.652. MIGRATORY OR UPLAND GAME BIRD STAMP REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person may not hunt a migratory or upland game bird in this state unless the person possesses the appropriate migratory or upland game bird stamp, as applicable, issued to the person by the department. The commission by rule may adopt requirements relating to possessing a stamp required by this subchapter.

(b) The commission by rule may exempt a person or class of persons from the stamp requirement of this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.653. HUNTING LICENSE REQUIRED. The possession of either a migratory or upland game bird stamp does not authorize a person to hunt a migratory or upland game bird:

(1) without possessing a hunting license as provided by Chapter 42; or

(2) at any time or by means not otherwise authorized by this code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.654. DESIGN AND ISSUANCE OF STAMPS. (a) The department may issue a migratory or upland game bird stamp to any person on payment to the department of $7 per stamp.

(b) The commission may issue and sell a collector's edition of the migratory or upland game bird stamps that does not authorize hunting. The commission shall set the fee for a stamp issued under this subsection.

(c) The department may authorize the use of the image of a stamp issued under this subchapter for products offered to the public for sale and not for the purpose of authorizing hunting. The department shall receive a reasonable royalty payment for the sale of any stamp products sold under this subsection.

(d) The commission by rule shall prescribe the form, design, and manner of issuance of a stamp under this subchapter. The department retains all rights to the design.

(e) The commission may contract with and pay a person for designing, producing, and marketing a stamp.

(f) The commission by rule may prescribe alternate requirements for identifying the purchaser of a stamp issued in an automated manner.

(g) A stamp issued under this subchapter is valid for hunting only during the yearly period for which the stamp is issued, without regard to the date on which the stamp is acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 of the year in which the stamp is issued or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.655. DISPOSITION OF MIGRATORY GAME BIRD STAMP NET PROCEEDS. (a) The migratory game bird stamp net proceeds shall be deposited to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account under Section 11.032 and may be used only for the purposes specified in Section 43.656.

(b) Net proceeds from the migratory game bird stamp consist of:

(1) proceeds from the issuance of migratory game bird stamps;

(2) the amount allocated by the department from the net proceeds of a combination license if migratory game bird stamps are issued as part of a combination license under Chapter 50;

(3) proceeds from the sale of collector's editions of migratory game bird stamps, if issued under Section 43.654(b);

(4) payments, including royalty payments, received for the use of the migratory game bird stamp image authorized under Section 43.654(c); and

(5) interest and other earnings from the investment of remaining net proceeds under Subsection (c).

(c) The comptroller shall invest the remaining net proceeds, if any, in accordance with state law.

(d) Any net proceeds under this section not used in a fiscal year remain in the game, fish, and water safety account and are exempt from the application of Section 403.095, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.656. USES OF NET PROCEEDS FROM MIGRATORY GAME BIRD STAMP. (a) Net proceeds from the migratory game bird stamp may be used only for:

(1) management of and research concerning migratory game birds;

(2) acquisition, lease, or development of migratory game bird habitats; and

(3) contracts, donations, and grants under Section 43.659.

(b) The department shall use the net proceeds from the migratory game bird stamp in a manner that addresses the needs of migratory birds in this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.657. DISPOSITION OF UPLAND GAME BIRD STAMP NET PROCEEDS. (a) The upland game bird stamp net proceeds shall be deposited to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account under Section 11.032 and may be used only for the purposes specified in Section 43.658.

(b) Net proceeds from the upland game bird stamp consist of:

(1) proceeds from the issuance of upland game bird stamps;

(2) the amount allocated by the department from the net proceeds of a combination license if upland game bird stamps are issued as part of a combination license under Chapter 50;

(3) proceeds from the sale of collector's editions of upland game bird stamps, if issued under Section 43.654(b);

(4) payments, including royalty payments, received for the use of the upland game bird stamp image authorized under Section 43.654(c); and

(5) interest and other earnings from the investment of remaining net proceeds under Subsection (c).

(c) The comptroller shall invest the remaining net proceeds, if any, in accordance with state law.

(d) Any net proceeds under this section not used in a fiscal year remain in the game, fish, and water safety account and are exempt from the application of Section 403.095, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.658. USES OF NET PROCEEDS FROM UPLAND GAME BIRD STAMP. (a) Net proceeds from the upland game bird stamp may be used only for:

(1) management of and research concerning upland game birds;

(2) acquisition, lease, or development of upland game bird habitats; and

(3) contracts, donations, and grants under Section 43.659.

(b) The department shall use the net proceeds from the upland game bird stamp in a manner that addresses the needs of upland game birds in this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.659. CONTRACTS, DONATIONS, AND GRANTS. As allowed under state and federal law, the department may make money available in advance or by reimbursement to appropriate state, regional, national, and international governmental and nonprofit organizations through contracts, donations, and grants. The money may be used to acquire, develop, and maintain migratory and upland game bird habitat areas in the United States, Canada, Mexico, or another country that provides migratory habitat for the Central Flyway.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.660. REFUSAL TO SHOW STAMP OR PROOF OF EXEMPTION ELIGIBILITY. A person hunting a migratory or upland game bird who refuses on demand of any game warden or other peace officer to show the applicable stamp, or proof that the person is exempt under Section 43.652(b), is presumed to be in violation of Section 43.652.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.661. RECIPROCAL AGREEMENTS RELATING TO MIGRATORY GAME BIRDS. As provided by Chapter 41, the department may negotiate a reciprocal agreement with a state that shares a common boundary with this state if the neighboring state has a similar migratory game bird stamp requirement and fee. The reciprocal agreement may permit a resident of the state with which the reciprocal agreement is made to hunt a migratory game bird in this state without a stamp issued under this subchapter if the person possesses a stamp issued by the other state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 43.665. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 43.652 commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 882 (S.B. 1192), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER U. FRESHWATER FISHING STAMP

Sec. 43.801. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "fresh water" has the meaning provided by Section 66.001.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Sec. 43.802. FRESHWATER FISHING STAMP REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or (c), no person may engage in fishing in fresh water for sporting purposes in this state unless the person has acquired a freshwater fishing stamp issued to the person by the department. The commission by rule may adopt requirements relating to possessing a freshwater fishing stamp required by this subchapter.

(b) A person who is exempted from obtaining a fishing license under Chapter 46 is not required to obtain a freshwater fishing stamp.

(c) The commission by rule may exempt a person from the freshwater fishing stamp requirement of this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Sec. 43.803. FISHING LICENSE REQUIRED. The acquisition of a freshwater fishing stamp does not authorize a person to fish in fresh water for sporting purposes without having acquired a fishing license as provided by Chapter 46. The acquisition of a freshwater fishing stamp does not authorize a person to fish at any time or by any means not otherwise authorized by this code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Sec. 43.804. DESIGN AND ISSUANCE OF STAMPS. (a) The department may issue a freshwater fishing stamp to any person on the payment to the department of $5. Except as provided by Subsection (e), a stamp must be signed on its face by the person using it for the stamp to be valid for fishing purposes.

(b) The department may issue a collectible freshwater fishing stamp to any person on the payment to the department of $5. A collectible freshwater fishing stamp does not authorize a person to fish and is not valid for fishing purposes.

(c) The commission by rule shall prescribe the form, design, and manner of issuance of the freshwater fishing stamp and the collectible freshwater fishing stamp. The department retains all reproduction rights to the design of the freshwater fishing stamp and the collectible freshwater fishing stamp.

(d) The commission may contract with and pay a person for designing and producing the freshwater fishing stamp or the collectible freshwater fishing stamp.

(e) The commission by rule may prescribe alternate requirements for identifying the purchaser of a freshwater fishing stamp issued in an automated manner.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Sec. 43.805. DISPOSITION OF STAMP FEES. (a) After deduction of any collection fee, the net receipts from freshwater fishing stamp and collectable freshwater fishing stamp sales shall be sent to the department.

(b) The net receipts from freshwater fishing stamp and collectable freshwater fishing stamp sales may be spent only for the:

(1) repair, maintenance, renovation, or construction of:

(A) freshwater fish hatcheries in this state; and

(B) facilities supporting the management of and research related to freshwater fisheries;

(2) purchase of game fish that are stocked into the public water of this state;

(3) restoration, enhancement, or management of freshwater fish habitats;

(4) development of shoreline-based projects allowing freshwater angler access; and

(5) administration and operation of freshwater fish hatcheries in an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the average annual net receipts in a state fiscal biennium.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 197 (S.B. 573), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 197 (S.B. 573), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 197 (S.B. 573), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 43.806. EXPIRATION OF STAMP. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or (c), a freshwater fishing stamp is valid for fishing only during the yearly period for which the stamp is issued, without regard to the date on which the stamp is acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 of the year in which the stamp is issued or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a stamp fee for a stamp issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this subchapter and provide for a stamp term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than one year.

(b) A freshwater fishing stamp issued before September 1 or another date set by the commission that does not expire until August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission is valid from the date of issuance through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission.

(c) A freshwater fishing stamp issued in conjunction with a license issued under Section 46.005 or 46.0051 expires on the later of the license expiration date or the date printed on the stamp.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Sec. 43.807. REFUSAL TO SHOW STAMP. A person fishing in fresh water for sporting purposes who refuses on demand of any game warden or peace officer to show a freshwater fishing stamp or proof that the person is exempt under Section 43.802(b) or a rule adopted under that section is presumed to be in violation of Section 43.802.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 78 (H.B. 1346), Sec. 3, eff. May 19, 2011.

Sec. 43.808. PENALTY. A person who violates Section 43.802 is guilty of a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 9(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2004; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2004.

SUBCHAPTER V. NONINDIGENOUS SNAKE PERMIT

Sec. 43.851. PERMIT. (a) The commission by rule shall establish permits that allow permit holders to possess or transport in this state a live nonindigenous snake, including a hybrid of any kind, that is:

(1) venomous; or

(2) a constrictor that is one of the following:

(A) African rock python, Python sebae;

(B) Asiatic rock python, Python molurus;

(C) Burmese python, Python bivittatus;

(D) green anaconda, Eunectes murinus;

(E) reticulated python, Python reticulatus; or

(F) southern African python, Python natalensis.

(b) The commission shall establish separate permits for recreational and commercial purposes.

(c) A permit under this subchapter is not required for:

(1) a state or county official performing an official duty;

(2) a licensed zoo that possesses or transports a snake for exhibition or scientific purposes;

(3) a research facility, including a university, licensed under the Animal Welfare Act (7 U.S.C. Section 2131 et seq.) that possesses or transports a snake for scientific purposes; or

(4) a person who assists a department employee in the handling or transport of a snake under this subchapter.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a person may not possess or transport in this state a snake described by Subsection (a) without a permit issued by the department under this subchapter.

(e) A person convicted of a violation of this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter may not obtain a permit before the fifth anniversary of the date of the conviction.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 340 (H.B. 2326), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.852. INSPECTION OF PERMIT AND RECORDS. An authorized department employee may inspect at any time and without a warrant a permit or any records required by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.853. RELEASE FROM CAPTIVITY. A person may not intentionally, knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence release or allow the release from captivity of a snake covered by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.854. SEIZURE OF CONTRABAND; FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY. (a) The department may arrange for the seizure and removal of a snake covered by this subchapter from a person who possesses the snake without the required permit. The person is responsible for any costs incurred by the department in the seizure, removal, and disposition of the snake.

(b) A department employee is not required to handle, remove, or dispose of the snake.

(c) The department may contract with a person who has knowledge of or expertise in the handling of a snake covered by this subchapter to assist the department in the handling, removal, and disposition of the snake.

(d) The department, including an enforcement officer of the department, who acts under this section is not liable in a civil action for the seizure, sale, donation, or other disposition of the snake.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.855. RULES. The commission may adopt rules to implement this subchapter, including rules to govern:

(1) the possession or transport of a snake covered by this subchapter;

(2) permit application forms, fees, and procedures;

(3) the release of the snake;

(4) reports that the department may require a permit holder to submit to the department; and

(5) other matters the commission considers necessary.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.856. OFFENSE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or (c), a person who violates this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) A person who violates Section 43.853 or a rule adopted to implement Section 43.853 commits an offense that is a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(c) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant for a violation of this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter that the defendant has engaged in a commercial activity without holding a required permit and the defendant has been previously convicted of a violation of this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter, on conviction the defendant shall be punished for a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 41, eff. April 1, 2008.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 340 (H.B. 2326), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER W. REPTILE AND AMPHIBIAN STAMP

Sec. 43.901. REPTILE AND AMPHIBIAN STAMP REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Section 43.905, a person may capture by nonlethal means an indigenous reptile or amphibian on the shoulder of a road, as defined by Section 541.302, Transportation Code, or the unpaved area of a public right-of-way only if the person possesses a reptile and amphibian stamp issued to the person by the department.

(b) The commission by rule shall prescribe the form, design, and manner of issuance of a stamp under this subchapter.

(c) The stamp is not valid unless the person to whom the stamp is issued has signed the stamp on its face.

(d) The commission by rule may prescribe alternate requirements for identifying the purchaser of a stamp issued in an automated manner.

(e) A stamp issued under this subchapter is valid only during the yearly period for which the stamp is issued without regard to the date on which the stamp is acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (H.B. 1788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 43.902. FEE. The fee for a reptile and amphibian stamp is $10. The department may issue other editions of the stamp that are not valid for capturing by nonlethal means a species covered by this subchapter for a fee set by the commission.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (H.B. 1788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 43.903. HUNTING LICENSE REQUIRED. The possession of a reptile and amphibian stamp does not authorize a person to capture by nonlethal means an indigenous reptile or amphibian:

(1) without possessing a hunting license required by Section 42.002 or 42.005; or

(2) at a time or by means not otherwise authorized by this code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (H.B. 1788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 43.904. STAMP SALE RECEIPTS. The net revenue derived from the sale of reptile and amphibian stamps shall be credited to the game, fish, and water safety account.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (H.B. 1788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 43.905. EXEMPTIONS. A person is not required to have a hunting license or reptile and amphibian stamp to capture by nonlethal means and subsequently release in another location an indigenous reptile or amphibian if the person is:

(1) performing activities related to the operation and maintenance of pipelines and related facilities or to oil or gas exploration or production;

(2) an employee of the state, a utility, as defined by Section 203.091, Transportation Code, or a power generation company, as defined by Section 31.002, Utilities Code, and is acting in the course and scope of the person's employment with the state, the utility, or the power generation company; or

(3) performing activities related to surface coal mining and reclamation operations as defined by Section 134.004, Natural Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (H.B. 1788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 43.906. PENALTY. (a) A person who violates Section 43.901 commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) A person, other than a person described by Section 43.905, in an area described by Section 43.901 who is engaged in capturing by nonlethal means a species covered by this subchapter and fails or refuses on the demand of any game warden or other peace officer to show a reptile and amphibian stamp is presumed to be in violation of Section 43.901.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (H.B. 1788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER X. DEER DISPOSITION PROTOCOL

Sec. 43.951. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies only to the disposition of the following deer:

(1) deer held at a facility covered by a permit issued under Subchapter L;

(2) deer on acreage covered by a permit issued under Subchapter R; and

(3) deer on acreage covered by a permit issued under Subchapter R-1.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (S.B. 820), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.952. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Animal health commission" means the Texas Animal Health Commission.

(2) "Permit" means a permit issued under Subchapter L, R, or R-1.

(3) "Permit holder" means a person to whom a permit is issued under Subchapter L, R, or R-1.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (S.B. 820), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.953. DESTRUCTION OF DEER. (a) Before any deer may be destroyed under this subchapter:

(1) an agent of the animal health commission may conduct an epidemiological assessment:

(A) if the assessment can be conducted in a timely manner; and

(B) contingent on the availability of funding; and

(2) the department must consider the results of an assessment, if conducted, under Subdivision (1).

(b) To control or prevent the spread of disease, deer to which this subchapter applies may be destroyed only if the department determines that the deer pose a threat to the health of other deer or other species, including humans.

(c) The department shall carry out an order to destroy deer after notice has been provided to the permit holder under Section 43.954.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (S.B. 820), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.954. NOTICE OF DEER DESTRUCTION. (a) The department must provide written notice of an order to destroy deer to a permit holder before the department may destroy any of the deer covered by the permit holder's permit.

(b) A notice provided under this section must be sent by certified mail to the last known address of the permit holder and must contain:

(1) the date of destruction, which may not be sooner than the 10th day after the date of the notice;

(2) an explanation of any access restrictions imposed on the facility or acreage covered by the permit during the destruction of the deer; and

(3) an explanation of the reasons for the destruction, including the results of any epidemiological assessment conducted under Section 43.953(a) applicable to the deer that are the subject of the notice.

(c) The permit holder may waive the notice requirements of this section.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (S.B. 820), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.955. COST OF ASSESSMENT AND DESTRUCTION OF DEER. (a) The applicable permit holder shall pay all costs associated with:

(1) an epidemiological assessment conducted under this subchapter to the animal health commission; and

(2) except as provided by Subsection (b), the destruction of deer under this subchapter to the department.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the department shall waive the costs associated with the destruction under this subchapter of breeder deer at a facility covered by a permit issued under Subchapter L where a breeder deer has tested positive for chronic wasting disease in a test performed by a testing laboratory accredited by the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(c) The department may not waive costs under Subsection (b) if the department determines that the permit holder or an agent of the permit holder, in violation of this chapter or a regulation of the commission, caused:

(1) the introduction of chronic wasting disease into the facility; or

(2) a delay in the detection of chronic wasting disease at the facility.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 99 (S.B. 820), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 36 (S.B. 1372), Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER Y. MANAGED LANDS DEER PROGRAM

Sec. 43.975. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "program" means the Managed Lands Deer Program described by 31 T.A.C. Section 65.29, or a successor to that program.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 426 (S.B. 733), Sec. 2, eff. June 4, 2019.

Sec. 43.976. PROGRAM PARTICIPATION FEE. (a) The commission by rule may impose a fee for participation in the program. Section 2001.0045, Government Code, does not apply to a rule adopted under this section.

(b) The commission shall remit a fee collected under Subsection (a) to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 426 (S.B. 733), Sec. 2, eff. June 4, 2019.

Sec. 43.977. RULES. The commission shall adopt rules required to implement the program.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 426 (S.B. 733), Sec. 2, eff. June 4, 2019.